Vermont, session 2025-2026, S306.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to give formal recognition and validation to public
safety and emergency services dispatchers, whose work in responding to
emergencies is critical and often traumatic, by providing access to benefits
VT LEG #385918 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.306
2026 Page 2 of 4
more traditionally associated with first responders, such as training
opportunities and access to mental health supports.
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. chapter 161 is added to read:
CHAPTER 161. FIRST RESPONDERS IN COMMUNICATIONS
§ 2461. DEFINITIONS
“First responder in communications” means any individual who is currently
or formerly certified by the Vermont Enhanced 911 Board as a 911 call taker, a
public safety dispatcher, public safety telecommunicator, emergency operator,
or emergency telecommunicator, or who is employed as an emergency
communications dispatcher providing service for an emergency provider
organization. A first responder in communications is responsible for the
administration or supervision of lifesaving communication services for
emergency situations.
§ 2462. TRAINING
To the extent practicable, employers of a first responder in communications
shall provide training to maintain and enhance the knowledge, skills, and
proficiency of the first responder in communications.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #385918 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.306
2026 Page 3 of 4
(11) “Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
employment” includes an injury caused by the willful act of a third person
directed against an employee because of that employment.
* * *
(I)(i) In the case of police officers, rescue or ambulance workers,
firefighters, or State employees, as that term is defined pursuant to subdivision
(iii)(VI) of this subdivision (11)(I), or first responders in communications, as
that term is defined pursuant to subdivision (iii)(VII) of this subdivision
(11)(I), post-traumatic stress disorder that is diagnosed by a mental health
professional shall be presumed to have been incurred during service in the line
of duty and shall be compensable, unless it is shown by a preponderance of the
evidence that the post-traumatic stress disorder was caused by nonservice-
connected risk factors or nonservice-connected exposure.
(ii) A police officer, rescue or ambulance worker, firefighter, or
State employee, or first responder in communications who is diagnosed with
post-traumatic stress disorder within three years following the last active date
of employment as a police officer, rescue or ambulance worker, firefighter, or
State employee, or first responder in communications shall be eligible for
benefits under this subdivision (11).
(iii) As used in this subdivision (11)(I):
* * *
VT LEG #385918 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.306
2026 Page 4 of 4
(VII) “First responder in communications” means an individual
as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2461.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385918 v.1